South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3550.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-5-4710 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-5-4710. Wreckers may must use a mounted oscillating, rotating or flashing red light only at the scene of accidentsan emergency scene and at any time while rendering assistance on the roadside. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----